Hawaii statutes.
§661-3 No jurisdiction, when. No
person shall file or prosecute under this part any claim for or in respect to
which that person or any assignee of that person has pending an action against
a person who, at the time when the claim alleged in the action arose, was, in
respect thereto, acting or professing to act, directly or indirectly, under the
authority of the State. [L 1894-5, c 26, §3; RL 1925, §2671; RL 1935, §4422; RL
1945, §10477; RL 1955, §245-3; HRS §661-3; am L 1972, c 164, §1(c); am L 2016,
c 55, §42]

Case Notes

Section does not prevent joinder of State and person who
acted or professed to act under State's authority as defendants in one suit. 9
H. App. 21, 821 P.2d 937 (1991).

Where plaintiffs brought individual and class action claims against
only the employees' retirement system and did not file a lawsuit against the
State while there was a pending action against a person acting under state
authority, this section did not bar the circuit court from having
jurisdiction. 121 H. 462 (App.), 220 P.3d 1043 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next